Hawaii statutes.
[§78-27] Temporary inter- and
intra-governmental assignments and exchanges. (a) With the approval of
the respective employer, a governmental unit of this State may participate in
any program of temporary inter- or intra-governmental assignments or exchanges
of employees as a sending or receiving agency. "Agency" means any
local, national, or foreign governmental agency or private agency with
government sponsored programs or projects.

(b) As a sending agency, a governmental unit
of this State may consider its employee on a temporary assignment or exchange
as being on detail to a regular work assignment or on leave of absence without
pay from the employee's position. The employee on temporary assignment or
exchange shall be entitled to the same rights and benefits as any other
employee of the sending agency.

(c) As a receiving agency, a governmental unit
of this State shall not consider the employee on a temporary assignment or
exchange who is detailed from the sending agency as its employee, except for
the purpose of disability or death resulting from personal injury arising out
of and in the course of the temporary assignment or exchange. The employee on
detail may not receive a salary from the receiving agency, but the receiving
agency may pay for or reimburse the sending agency for the costs, or any
portion of the costs, of salaries, benefits, and travel and transportation
expenses if it will benefit from the assignment or exchange.

(d) An agreement consistent with this section
and policies of the employer shall be made between the sending and receiving
agencies on matters relating to the assignment or exchange, including but not
limited to supervision of duties, costs of salary and benefits, and travel and
transportation expenses; provided that the agreement shall not diminish any
rights or benefits to which an employee of a governmental unit of this State is
entitled under this section.

(e) As a receiving agency, a governmental unit
of this State may give the employee of the sending agency on a temporary
assignment or exchange an exempt appointment and grant the employee rights and
benefits as other exempt appointees of the receiving agency if it will benefit
from the assignment or exchange. [L 2000, c 253, pt of §74]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next